Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202645-380
Fees, charges, and costs; remittance.

All original license fees, annual renewal fees, investigation and examination fees, charges, and costs collected by or paid to the department pursuant to the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Financial Institution Assessment Cash Fund and shall be available for the uses and purposes of the fund.

Laws 2025, LB474, § 101.